apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="nik/kel__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~kel / ~kelet | (~let) / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l>kel</l>       <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kelet</l>     <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>let</l>       <r>kel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="forskel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~le / ~lene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kriminel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Utrum; ~ / ~le / ~le / ~le -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rom__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~men / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="minim/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~ummet / ~a / ~aene -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ummet</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aene</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sum__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~men / ~mer / ~merne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>merne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pen__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen / ~ne / ~nene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="løn__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~nen / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="som/mer__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~mer / ~meren / ~re / ~rene -->
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>meren</l>     <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kam/mer__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~mer / ~meret / ~re / ~rene -->
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>meret</l>     <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fæt/ter__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ter / ~teren / ~re / ~rene -->
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>teren</l>     <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hør__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ren / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="åndedræt__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~tet / # / # -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kr/aft__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~aft / ~aften / ~æfter / ~æfterne -->
  <e>       <p><l>aft</l>       <r>aft<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aften</l>     <r>aft<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æfter</l>     <r>aft<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æfterne</l>   <r>aft<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sæt__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~tet / ~ / ~tene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="løn">             <i>løn</i><par n="løn__n"/></e>
<e lm="åndedræt">        <i>åndedræt</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="ret" a="PT" c="domain:juridik"><i>ret</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="dragkraft" a="PT"><i>dragkr</i><par n="kr/aft__n"/></e>
<e lm="schakkel" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>schak</i><par n="nik/kel__n"/></e>
<e lm="forskel">         <i>forskel</i><par n="forskel__n"/></e>
<e lm="fætter">          <i>fæt</i><par n="fæt/ter__n"/></e>
<e lm="hør">             <i>hør</i><par n="hør__n"/></e>
<e lm="kraft">           <i>kr</i><par n="kr/aft__n"/></e>
<e lm="kriminel">        <i>kriminel</i><par n="kriminel__n"/></e>
<e lm="minimum">         <i>minim</i><par n="minim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="nikkel">          <i>nik</i><par n="nik/kel__n"/></e>
<e lm="pen">             <i>pen</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
<e lm="rom">             <i>rom</i><par n="rom__n"/></e>
<e lm="sommer">          <i>som</i><par n="som/mer__n"/></e>
<e lm="forkammer">       <i>forkam</i><par n="kam/mer__n"/></e>
<e lm="nummer">          <i>num</i><par n="kam/mer__n"/></e>
<e lm="personnummer">    <i>personnum</i><par n="kam/mer__n"/></e>
<e lm="sum">             <i>sum</i><par n="sum__n"/></e>
<e lm="sæt">             <i>sæt</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="snit">            <i>snit</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="typesnit">        <i>typesnit</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="grænsesnit">      <i>grænsesnit</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="afsnit">          <i>afsnit</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="tværsnit">        <i>tværsnit</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="udslet">          <i>udslet</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="net">             <i>net</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="rutenet">         <i>rutenet</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="elnet">           <i>elnet</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="klokkeslæt">      <i>klokkeslæt</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="afsæt">           <i>afsæt</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
<e lm="regelsæt">        <i>regelsæt</i><par n="sæt__n"/></e>
